Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201655-603
Commission on Military and Veteran Affairs; officers; meetings; records.

The Commission on Military and Veteran Affairs shall elect a chairperson, vice-chairperson, and secretary from among its members.

The commission shall meet two times each year at such times and places as shall be determined by the chairperson and shall keep a record of its proceedings. The chairperson may call special meetings at any time he or she deems necessary. The secretary shall mail written notice of the time and place of all meetings in advance to each voting and nonvoting, ex officio member of the commission. The secretary shall also provide notice of all meetings as provided under section 84-1411.

Laws 2016, LB754, § 3.
July 21, 2016